Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.143

Vendor payments, advances or reimbursements for.

In order that each college treasurer appointed in accordance with RCW 28B.50.142 may make vendor payments, the state treasurer will honor warrants drawn by each community and technical college providing for one initial advance on July 1 of each succeeding biennium from the state general fund in an amount equal to seventeen percent of each institution's average monthly allotment for such budgeted biennium expenditures as certified by the office of financial management, and at the conclusion of each such initial month, and for each succeeding month of any biennium, the state treasurer will reimburse each institution for each expenditure incurred and reported monthly by each college treasurer in accordance with *chapter 43.83 RCW: PROVIDED, That the reimbursement to each institution for actual expenditures incurred in the final month of each biennium shall be less the initial advance.

[ 1991 c 238 s 41; 1985 c 180 s 1; 1979 c 151 s 21; 1977 ex.s. c 331 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The majority of chapter 43.83 RCW was decodified pursuant to 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 12.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 331: See notes following RCW 28B.15.031.